Missouri, session 2026, SB1432.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.805, 313.820, and 313.835, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 313.805, 313.820, and 313.835, to read as
follows:
313.805. The commission shall have full jurisdiction
over and shall supervise all gambling operations governed by
sections 313.800 to 313.850. The commission shall have the
following powers and shall promulgate rules and regulations
to implement sections 313.800 to 313.850:
(1) To investigate applicants and determine the
priority and eligibility of applicants for a license and to
select among competing applicants for a license the
applicant which best serves the interests of the citizens of
Missouri;
(2) To license the operators of excursion gambling
boats and operators of gambling games within such boats, to
identify occupations within the excursion gambling boat
operations which require licensing, and adopt standards for
licensing the occupations including establishing fees for
the occupational licenses and to license suppliers;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1432 2
(3) To adopt standards under which all excursion
gambling boat operations shall be held and standards for the
facilities within which the gambling operations are to be
held. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 311 to the
contrary, the commission may authorize the operation of
gambling games on an excursion gambling boat which is also
licensed to sell or serve alcoholic beverages, wine, or
beer. The commission shall regulate the wagering structure
for gambling excursions, provided that the commission shall
not establish any regulations or policies that limit the
amount of wagers, losses, or buy-in amounts;
(4) To enter the premises of excursion gambling boats,
facilities, or other places of business of a licensee within
this state to determine compliance with sections 313.800 to
313.850;
(5) To investigate alleged violations of sections
313.800 to 313.850 or the commission rules, orders, or final
decisions;
(6) To assess any appropriate administrative penalty
against a licensee, including, but not limited to,
suspension, revocation, and penalties of an amount as
determined by the commission up to three times the highest
daily amount of gross receipts derived from wagering on the
gambling games, whether unauthorized or authorized,
conducted during the previous twelve months as well as
confiscation and forfeiture of all gambling game equipment
used in the conduct of unauthorized gambling games.
Forfeitures pursuant to this section shall be enforced as
provided in sections 513.600 to 513.645;
(7) To require a licensee, an employee of a licensee
or holder of an occupational license to remove a person
violating a provision of sections 313.800 to 313.850 or the

SB 1432 3
commission rules, orders, or final orders, or other person
deemed to be undesirable from the excursion gambling boat or
adjacent facilities;
(8) To require the removal from the premises of a
licensee, an employee of a licensee, or a holder of an
occupational license for a violation of sections 313.800 to
313.850 or a commission rule or engaging in a fraudulent
practice;
(9) To require all licensees to file all financial
reports required by rules and regulations of the commission;
(10) To issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of
books, records, and other pertinent documents, and to
administer oaths and affirmations to the witnesses, when, in
the judgment of the commission, it is necessary to enforce
sections 313.800 to 313.850 or the commission rules;
(11) To keep accurate and complete records of its
proceedings and to certify the records as may be appropriate;
(12) To ensure that the gambling games are conducted
fairly. No gambling device shall be set to pay out less
than eighty percent of all wagers;
(13) To require all licensees of gambling game
operations to use a cashless wagering system whereby all
players' money is converted to physical or electronic
tokens, electronic cards, or chips which only can be used on
the excursion gambling boat;
(14) To require excursion gambling boat licensees to
develop a system, approved by the commission, that allows
patrons the option to prohibit the excursion gambling boat
licensee from using identifying information for marketing
purposes. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply
only to patrons giving identifying information for the first

SB 1432 4
time. Such system shall be submitted to the commission by
October 1, 2000, and approved by the commission by January
1, 2001. The excursion gambling boat licensee shall use
identifying information obtained from patrons who have
elected to have marketing blocked under the provisions of
this section only for the purposes of enforcing the
requirements contained in sections 313.800 to 313.850. This
section shall not prohibit the commission from accessing
identifying information for the purposes of enforcing
section 313.004 and sections 313.800 to 313.850;
(15) To determine which of the authorized gambling
games will be permitted on any licensed excursion gambling
boat;
(16) The commission shall base its decision to license
excursion gambling boats on any of the following criteria:
the docking location or the excursion cruise could cause
danger to the boat's passengers, violate federal law or the
law of another state, or cause disruption of interstate
commerce or possible interference with railway or barge
100 transportation. The commission shall consider economic
101 feasibility or impact that would benefit land-based
102 development and permanent job creation. The commission
103 shall not discriminate among applicants for excursion
104 gambling boats that are similarly situated with respect to
105 the criteria set forth in this section;
106 (17) The commission shall render a finding or findings
107 concerning the transition from a boat, barge, or floating
108 facility to a nonfloating facility within thirty days after
109 a hearing on any request from an applicant or existing
110 licensee. Such hearing may be held prior to any final
111 action on licensing to assist an applicant and any city or
112 county in the finalizing of their economic development plan;

SB 1432 5
113 (18) To require any applicant for a license or renewal
114 of a license to operate an excursion gambling boat to
115 provide an affirmative action plan which has as its goal the
116 use of best efforts to achieve maximum employment of African-
117 Americans and other minorities and maximum participation in
118 the procurement of contractual purchases of goods and
119 services. This provision shall be administered in
120 accordance with all federal and state employment laws,
121 including Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as
122 amended by the Civil Rights Act of 1991. At license
123 renewal, the licensee will report on the effectiveness of
124 the plan. The commission shall include the licensee's
125 reported information in its annual report to the joint
126 committee on gaming and wagering;
127 (19) To annually adjust the admission fee imposed
128 pursuant to section 313.820 for inflation; and
129 (20) To take any other action as may be reasonable or
130 appropriate to enforce sections 313.800 to 313.850 and the
131 commission rules.
313.820. 1. An excursion boat licensee shall pay to
the commission an admission fee of two dollars, as adjusted
for inflation, for each person embarking on an excursion
gambling boat with a ticket of admission. [One dollar]
Fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to the credit
of the gaming commission fund as authorized pursuant to
section 313.835, and [one dollar] fifty percent of such fee
shall not be considered state funds and shall be paid to the
home dock city or county. Subject to appropriation, one
cent of such fee deposited to the credit of the gaming
commission fund may be deposited to the credit of the
compulsive gamblers fund created pursuant to the provisions
of section 313.842. Nothing in this section shall preclude

SB 1432 6
any licensee from charging any amount deemed necessary for a
ticket of admission to any person embarking on an excursion
gambling boat. If tickets are issued which are good for
more than one excursion, the admission fee shall be paid to
the commission for each person using the ticket on each
excursion that the ticket is used. If free passes or
complimentary admission tickets are issued, the excursion
boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same fee upon
these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold
at the regular and usual admission rate; however, the
excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual
and necessary officials and employees of the licensee or
other persons actually working on the excursion gambling
boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the
rules of the commission, and a list of all persons to whom
the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the
commission.
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes,
sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes, property taxes or
any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any
political subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit
tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes or fees shall
be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by
a political subdivision. All state taxes not connected
directly to gambling games shall be collected by the
department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 32.057 to the contrary, the department of revenue
may furnish and the commission may receive tax information
to determine if applicants or licensees are complying with
the tax laws of this state; however, any tax information
acquired by the commission shall not become public record
and shall be used exclusively for commission business.

SB 1432 7
313.835. All revenue received by the commission from
license fees, penalties, administrative fees, reimbursement
by any excursion gambling boat operators for services
provided by the commission and admission fees authorized
pursuant to the provisions of sections 313.800 to 313.850,
except that portion of the admission fee, not to exceed one
cent, that may be appropriated to the compulsive gamblers
fund as provided in section 313.820, shall be deposited in
the state treasury to the credit of the "Gaming Commission
Fund" which is hereby created for the sole purpose of
funding the administrative costs of the commission, subject
to appropriation. Moneys deposited into this fund shall not
be considered proceeds of gambling operations. Moneys
deposited into the gaming commission fund shall be
considered state funds pursuant to Article IV, Section 15 of
the Missouri Constitution. All interest received on the
gaming commission fund shall be credited to the gaming
commission fund. In each fiscal year, total revenues to the
gaming commission fund for the preceding fiscal year shall
be compared to total expenditures and transfers from the
gaming commission fund for the preceding fiscal year. The
remaining net proceeds in the gaming commission fund shall
be distributed in the following manner:
(1) The first five hundred thousand dollars shall be
appropriated on a per capita basis to cities and counties
that match the state portion and have demonstrated a need
for funding community neighborhood organization programs for
the homeless and to deter gang-related violence and crimes;
(2) The remaining net proceeds in the gaming
commission fund for fiscal year 2013 and each fiscal year
thereafter shall be distributed as follows:

SB 1432 8
(a) The first five million dollar portion shall be
transferred to the access Missouri financial assistance
fund, established pursuant to the provisions of sections
173.1101 to 173.1107, and additional moneys as annually
appropriated by the general assembly shall be appropriated
to such fund;
(b) The second three million dollar portion shall be
transferred to the veterans' commission capital improvement
trust fund created in section 42.300;
(c) The third four million dollar portion shall be
transferred to the Missouri National Guard trust fund
created in section 41.214, and additional moneys as
appropriated by the general assembly may be appropriated to
such fund, up to one million five hundred thousand dollars
annually;
(d) The fourth fifteen million dollar portion shall be
transferred to the Missouri department of natural resources
historic preservation fund and shall be used to preserve and
protect collections of historic artifacts;
(e) Subject to appropriations, one hundred percent of
remaining net proceeds in the gaming commission fund, after
the appropriations are made pursuant to the provisions of
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subdivision, shall be
transferred to the veterans' commission capital improvement
trust fund created in section 42.300.
✓